District of Columbia statutes.
5-806

Administrative review.

A member in conditional retirement may challenge the imposition of penalties imposed by §§ 5-804 and 5-805 in an administrative proceeding before the District of Columbia Office of Employee Appeals, pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 507, 47 DCR 4619